Utah statutes.
26-8a-411.   Limitation on repetitive applications.

A person who has previously applied for a license under Sections 26-8a-406 through 26-8a-409 may not apply for a license for the same service that covers any exclusive geographic service area that was the subject of the prior application unless:

(1)  one year has passed from the date of the issuance of a final decision under Section 26-8a-407; or

(2)  all interested parties and the department agree that a new application is in the public interest.

